Washington statutes.
RCW 19.134.040

Information statement—Prerequisite to contract or payment—File maintained.

Before the execution of a contract or agreement between the consumer and a credit services organization or before the receipt by the credit services organization of any money or other valuable consideration, whichever occurs first, the credit services organization shall provide the consumer with a statement in writing, containing all the information required by RCW 19.134.050. The credit services organization shall maintain on file for a period of four years following the completion or termination of the credit services organization agreement with the consumer an exact copy of the statement.

[ 2023 c 144 s 5; 1986 c 218 s 5.]